tools/hyphenators/hyph_sma.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a2a1d1
.a2a
.a2a1f1
.a2ak1
.aal1
.aa1t1
.a1b2a
.a1b2i1
.ac1
.a1c2e
.a2c2i
.2ad1
.a1d2a
.a1d2e1
.a1d2i
.a2d1j1
.1a2d1m2
.a2e1l1
.a2e
.a2er1
.a2ev1
.2a1f1
.2ag1
.a2i1s1
.a1i
.a2k1k2
.2ak
.1a2k2s1
.a2k2t1
.a1k2u1
.al1
.a2l1b2
.a1l2e1
.a1l2i1
.a2l2l2
.a2l1p1
.a2l1v1
.a1m2a1
.a2m1b1
.an2
.a2n1d1
.a2n1n1
.a2n1t1
.2a1p1
.a1p2a
.a1r2e2
.a2r1k1
.a1s2a
.as2
.a1s2i1
.a1sj2
.2a2s2t1
.a1t1
.a1t2a1
.at2j1
.a1u2
.1a2u2e1
.aur1
.1a2u2t1
.a1v2a
.a1v
.a2v2j2
.a1w1
.a2å1t2
.a2å
.á1b1
.1á2h1k1
.á2h
.á2h1t1
.á1j1
.1áj2a1
.ám1
.á1r2a1
.2á2r
.á2r1d1
.á2s2
.á1s2å1
.á1t2a1
.át2
.á1t2u1
.ba1l
.1b2a
.ba1s2
.ba1t1
.b1ál1
.1b2á
.b1b2u1
.2b2b2
.b1d2e
.2bd
.b2d1j2
.b2e1m1
.1b2e
.be2s1
.b2e1t1
.bi1j1
.1b2i
.b2i1n1
.b2ï2l1
.1b2ï
.b1k2e
.2b2k2
.bo2e1
.1b2o
.bo1g1
.bo1l1
.b1r2i1
.br2
.1b2r2u1
.bus1
.1b2u
.bys2
.1b2y1
.bæ2s1
.1b2æ
.can1
.1c2a
.c2er1
.1c2e
.2c1h2
.1c2i1
.ci1n1
.col1
.1c2o
.co1m1
.c1r2e1
.2c2r
.čih1
.1č2i
.dab1
.1d2a
.d2ad1
.da2j2
.da1l
.d2a1t1
.2d1e2a
.1d2e
.1de1b1
.d2e1h1
.1d2i2
.di1n1
.1d2i2r
.1di2s1
.2d1i1t1
.dï2j1
.2d2ï
.d2j2e1
.2d1j
.d1j2o1
.1d2o2
.d2o1b1
.do1d1
.d2o1s1
.2d1o2v1
.2dó1
.d1r2i1
.2d1r2
.d2s2a1
.2ds2
.d1s2i1
.d1s2u1
.1d2u2
.du1l1
.du1p1
.d2us1
.2d1v2i1
.2d1v2
.2d1ø1
.2d1å2e1
.1d2å
.d2år1
.1ea2i1
.e2a
.1eal1
.e1b1
.e1c2o1
.2e1c
.2e2e2
.e2e1g1
.e2e1k1
.e2e1n1
.e1f1
.e1f2e1
.2e1g1
.e1g2o1
.e1g2å1
.2eh1
.eit1
.e1i
.2ek1
.e2l1l1
.2e1l
.e1l2o1
.e1l2u1
.e1l2æ1
.2e1m1
.e1m2a
.e1m2e
.e1m2æ1
.e2n2g1
.en1
.e2n1n1
.e2n2t1
.e1p2e1
.2e1p1
.e1p2i1
.e1r2e1
.2er
.e1r2i
.e1r2o1
.e2r1s2
.e2r1t1
.e1s2a1
.es1
.e1t2a
.2e1t
.e2t2e1
.e2t1h1
.e1t2i1
.et2j1
.1e2tm1
.2ev1
.e1v2a1
.e1v2o1
.e1x2e1
.1e2x1
.2e1y1
.e1yt1
.f2a2f1
.1f2a
.f2er1
.1f2e
.f2e1t1
.2f1f1
.f2f2a1
.1f2i2
.f2i1g1
.fi1n1
.fis1
.f1k2i
.2f2k2
.fo2n1
.1f2o
.f1y1r1
.1f2y
.g2ad1
.1g2a
.ga1t1
.ga1v1
.ga1z1
.gá2s1
.1g2á
.1g1b2e
.2g2b2
.g2b1j2
.g2e1l1
.1g2e
.g1g2e1
.2g1g2
.g2h2a1
.2g1h
.1g2i1
.gi1l1
.g1j2o1
.2g2j2
.go2e1
.1g2o
.1gol1
.go1n1
.g2o1s1
.g1r2e1
.1g1r2
.2g1r2i1
.1gum1
.g2u
.hal1
.1h2a
.ham1
.ha2r1
.h2e1d1
.1h2e
.h2e1l1
.2h2e1t1
.hi1n1
.1h2i
.hi1t1
.h2o1j1
.1h2o
.ho1k1
.ho1n1
.ho1r
.ho1t1
.2h1t2e
.2ht
.hur1
.1h2u
.hu2s
.h2u1t1
.h1v2i1
.2h1v2
.2i1b1
.i1d1
.2i1d2a
.2i1d2i1
.i2e1l1
.i2e
.2i1f1
.i2f2s2
.ih1
.1i2i2e
.i1i
.1ii1n1
.ii1s2
.i1j1
.i1j2o1
.i1l1
.i1l2a
.i1l2i1
.i2l1l1
.i1m1
.i1n2a
.i1n
.i1n2e1
.i2n2n1
.1i2n2r1
.i2n1t1
.i1o1
.i1r2i1
.2ir
.1i2s1b1
.i1s2e1
.2i2s1j1
.i2s2t1
.i1t2e1
.i1v2a2
.i2v1g
.i1v2i
.i2v1t1
.i1w2i
.i1w1
.i1ya1
.i1y2
.1i1z1
.ï2ek1
.ï2e
.ïh2
.ïv2
.ja2a
.j2a
.1jab1
.1j2ad1
.1j2ak1
.jam1
.ja1t1
.ja1v1
.1j2e1d1
.j2e
.1j2eh1
.1j2e1l1
.j2e1m1
.ji1n1
.j2i1
.jï2e1
.1j2ï
.jo1g1
.1j2o
.jo2h1
.jo1n1
.j2os1
.jo2v1
.2j2r1
.juk1
.2j2u
.2j1v1
.j1v2e1
.1jå2a1
.j2å
.1k2a2
.k2a1d1
.ka1l1
.k2e2e1
.1k2e
.k2e1l1
.k2e1m1
.ke1n2
.k2e1p1
.k2er1
.k2e1t1
.2k2g1
.ki1d1
.1k2i
.ki2m1
.k2ir1
.kis1
.1k2k2s1
.2k1k2
.k1n2i1
.2k1n2
.ko2h1
.1k2o
.ko1l1
.kor1
.k2o1s1
.ku1l1
.1k2u
.ku1m1
.ku1p1
.k1u1s1
.k2u1t1
.2k2u1v1
.ky1l1
.1k2y1
.1la2a1
.1l2a
.l2ad1
.2l2ak1
.1la2r
.las2
.1la1t1
.l2a1v1
.l2e2e1
.1l2e
.l2ej1
.l2e1t1
.2l1f2
.1l2i2
.l2i1b1
.li1d1
.l2i1f1
.1l2i2g1
.li1l1
.li1m1
.li1n1
.1li1s1
.lit1
.lï2e1
.1l2ï
.l1k2a1
.2l1k2
.l1l2a2
.2l1l
.2l1m1
.l2n2r1
.2l1n
.lo1f1
.1l2o
.log1
.lo1k1
.lo2n1
.2l1or1
.2l1ot1
.lo2v1
.l2t2i1
.2l1t2
.l1t2u1
.lu1l1
.1l2u
.2l1ü1
.l2v2o1
.2l1v
.2l1x1
.l2y2ö1
.2l1y
.l2å1t2
.2l2å
.m2ad1
.1m2a
.2m2a1k1
.mam1
.m2a2s2
.ma1t1
.má1j1
.1m2á
.2m1b1
.m1b2i1
.m2b2j2
.m2e1d1
.1m2e
.m2e1j1
.m2e1t1
.1m2i2
.m2i1b1
.mi1d1
.mi1j1
.mi1l1
.mi1m1
.mi1n1
.mi1t1
.2m1k1
.m1k2i1
.2m2l1
.m1l2i
.m2l1s2
.m1m2e1
.2m1m2
.1m2o2
.mot1
.2m1p1
.m1p2i1
.2m1t1
.m2w2e1
.2m1w2
.1m2æ2
.mæ1l1
.m2öt1
.1m2ö
.m2å2å1
.2m2å
.n2a1b1
.1n2a
.n2a1f1
.n2al1
.nas2
.na1t1
.2na2v1
.1n2á2r1
.1n2á
.n2e1d1
.1n2e
.2n2e2g1
.n2e2h1
.n2ej1
.n2e1l1
.n2e1t1
.n2g2
.ni1d1
.1n2i
.ni2e1
.ni1n1
.1nj2i1
.1n2j2
.1nj2å1
.2n1k2
.n1m2u1
.2n1m2
.1n2o2
.1n2o2e1
.n1o2h1
.1n2o2r1
.1n2os1
.n1p2a
.2n1p2
.n2p2i
.1n2r2f2
.2n2r1
.2n2s1b1
.2n1s2
.n2s2i1
.n2u2j2
.n2u
.1n1u1l1
.1n2u2m1
.1n2v2e1
.2n1v2
.n1än1
.1n2ä1
.oa1r2
.2o1a
.oa1s2
.o1b2a
.2ob
.o1d2a
.o1d
.o1d2i
.o1d2o1
.o2e1
.1o2e1d1
.o1f1
.og1
.o2g2a
.o2h1
.o2h1t
.1o2k1s2
.o1k
.o2l1m1
.om1
.o1m2i1
.o1n2a1
.o1n
.o1r2i1
.o2r1k1
.o2r2r2
.o2r1t1
.2os1
.o2s2a
.o1s2e1
.o2s2s2
.o2s2t1
.ot2
.1o2t2h1
.o1t2i1
.o1t2j2
.1o2t1t1
.o2u1t1
.2o1u1
.o2v1
.1o2v1d1
.o2v1n1
.2p1b1
.p2e1d1
.1p2e
.p2e1m1
.p2er1
.p2e1t1
.2p2h2
.p2i1g1
.1p2i
.pi1j1
.p2i1r1
.pi1s1
.pol1
.1p2o
.pom1
.p2os1
.po1t1
.p1s2t1
.2ps2
.p2u2t1
.1p2u
.py1r1
.1p2y
.p1å2e1
.2p2å2
.rab1
.1r2a
.r2a1d1
.r2a1f1
.r2ak1
.2r1d2a1
.2r1d
.r2d1m2
.re1b1
.1r2e
.r2e1d1
.r2eh1
.r2ej1
.r2e1m1
.r2e1t1
.r2e2v1
.2r1g1
.ri1d1
.1r2i
.r2i1g1
.r2i1j1
.ri1l1
.ri1m1
.ri1n1
.ro1f1
.1r2o
.ro1g1
.1r2os1
.1ro2š1
.2r1s1
.r1t2a1
.2r1t
.2ru1l1
.1r2u
.2r1v1
.r2y2n1
.2r2y
.ræf1
.1r2æ
.2r2å2å1
.1s2a2
.sa1b1
.s2ad1
.1sal1
.sa1n1
.s2a1t1
.sa1v1
.s1b2o1
.2s1b
.s2d2e
.2s1d2
.1s2e2
.2se2a1
.s2e1d1
.2se1f1
.s2e1m1
.s2e1t1
.s2h2o1
.2s1h2
.si1d1
.1s2i
.s2i1j1
.1sj2
.1s2j2e1
.1s2j2o1
.2s2l2i
.s1l2
.s1m2e1
.2s2m2
.s2m2i1
.s1m2ö1
.s2m2å1
.s1o2f1
.1so
.1s2o2g1
.s2os1
.s2r1j1
.2s2r2
.s2t2
.st2e1
.s1t2i1
.s1v2o1
.2s2v2
.1sys2
.1s2y2
.s2æv1
.1s2æ
.s2å1g1
.1s2å
.š1j2o1
.2š1j
.1t2a1
.2tab1
.ta1c1
.ta2l1
.t2a1t1
.t2e2
.1t2e2e1
.1t2e1l1
.1t2e1m1
.2th2
.1t2i2
.t2i1b1
.t2i1f1
.t2i1g1
.tih1
.ti1j1
.ti1l1
.ti2m1
.ti1n1
.2t2j2o1
.t2j
.2t1n1
.tor1
.1t2o
.1to2v1
.t1r2a1
.2t2r2
.t2rä1
.1t1s2a1
.t2s
.2t1t1
.1t2u2
.tu1m1
.t2uv1
.t1v2e1
.1tv2
.t1z2a1
.2t1z
.t1z2e1
.2ub1
.uc1
.u2e1
.2ug1
.uk1
.1u2l1m1
.u1l
.1u2n1d1
.u2n1
.1u2n2n1
.2u1o1
.u1p1
.u1r2a1
.u1r2o1
.u1s2a
.1u2s2b1
.u2s1j1
.u2s2t1
.2u1t1
.u2t2s1
.u2t1t1
.v2a2d1
.1v2a
.v2ak1
.1val1
.1va1n1
.va1z1
.v1d2i1
.2vd
.1v2e1
.v2eh1
.v2e1l1
.1v2e1t1
.v2e1v1
.1v2i1
.vi1d1
.1vi1j1
.vi1n1
.v2i1r1
.1vis1
.vit1
.2v1k1
.vog1
.1v2o
.vo1n1
.war1
.1w2a
.wa2s2
.w2e2k1
.1w2e
.1w2e1t1
.w1r2i1
.2w1r2
.wur1
.2wu
.xi1a1
.1x2i
.x1l2a1
.x1l2
.y1d2i1
.2y2d1
.y1h1
.y1l2i1
.y1l
.y1r2i1
.y1r
.ys2
.2za1b1
.1z2a
.1z2á1
.zi1d1
.1z2i2
.æ1g2e1
.2æ2j1
.ä1i1
.1ø1i1
.ø2rn1
.2ø2r
.1ø2s2t1
.2øs1
.öl2
.ål1
.å1n2e1
.2ån
.å2rj1
.2år
.å2r1s1
.1å1s2e1
.å2s2
.ås2t1
.å2år1
.2å2å
a2a
a2a2a1
1aab1
aa1b2e1
1a1ad.
a2ad
aa2d2a
1aa1d2e
1a1a2d1h2
1aa1d2i
1aa2d1j1
1a1a2d1m2
aa2d2u
aa2d2y2
aa2d2æ
aa1f2e1
a2a1f
1a2ah1
aa1h2o1
aa2i
1aaj1
1aa2j2h1
aa1l2a1
aa2lh1
1aa2l1k2
aa1m2a1
1aa2m2h
a1a2m1t1
1aa2n2h2
1aa1n2i
1a2a1p1
aa1r2a1
aa2rh1
a1a2r1m2
aa2s2
1a2a1s2e1
1aa2s1h2
1aa1s2i1
aa1s1j2
1aa1s2y2
aa1t2i1
aa1t
aa2v1
aa1v2e1
1aa2v2h1
aa1v2i1
a1a1w2
a1a2w2g2
1a2á1
1a2b2b2
1ab1b2a1
1a2bc
a2b1d
ab1d2e1
abe2a1
a1b2e
1ab2e1m
a2b1es1
a2b2f2
a2b2h2
a1b2i1
ab2j2g2
a2bj2
ab2j2s2
1a2b2k2
ab1l2a1
a2b1l2
ab1l2o1
1a2b1m2
2a2b1p2
ab1p2a1
a2b1r2
a2b1r2a1
1a2b1s2
a2b2t2
a1b2æ1
a1b2ø1
ac2as2
a1c2a
a2c1c1
a2ces1
a1c2e
a2c1h2
ac1h2a1
ac1h2e1
ac1h2i1
a2c2i
aci1a1
aci1t2
1a2c2j
ac2j1g2
ac1k2a1
a2c1k
1ac1k2o1
a2c2l
1a2c1n2
a2c1s2
1a2c1t2
1ac1t2i
a1c2u1
a2c2z2
1a2c2´
a1č
a1ç
2ad
1ad.
2ad2ad1
a1d2a
a2dam
ad2a1t1
ad1d2e1
a2d1d2
1ad2d2´
a1d2e
ad2e2e
ad2eh1
1a2d1g2
1a2d1h2
ad1h2a1
ad2h2d2
a1d2i
a2di2e
adi1m1
a1di2s1
a2d1j1
ad2j2e1
ad2j2g2
ad1l2e1
a2d2l1
1a2d1m2
ad2m2i1
1a2d2n2
ad1n2a1
a1d1n2e1
a1d2o2
a2dó1
a2d1p2
1a2d1r2
ad2r2e1
1a2d2s2
ad1s2t2
2a2d1t
1a2d1v2
1a2d1z1
1a2d2´
a2đ
a1đa1
1a2đg2
a2e
a1e2a1
1a1e1b1
1a2e1c1
ae2c2i
ae2c2j2
a2e1d1
a2e2e1
1ae2e1n1
ae1g2e2
a2e1g
1ae2g1n2
1a2eh2
ae2ht1
1a2e2j1
ae2j1v1
ae2l1l1
a2e1l
1ae2l1m
ae2l2t2
2a2e1m
ae1m2e1
a2en1
a2e1p1
1a2e2p2a
1ae2rh
a2er
ae2r1n
1ae2r1p2
1a2es1
1ae1s2a1
1ae1s2e
1ae1s2i
1ae2sj2
1ae2s2k2
a1e1u
a2ev1
ae1v2a1
1ae2v2j2
a1é
2a1f
a2f1a2s2
a1f2a
a2f1f
af1f2i1
a1f2i1
a2fi1d1
a2fi1n
a2f2j1g2
a1f2j2
a2f2o
a2f2p2
af2p2j2
a2f2r2
af1r2o1
1a2fs2
af1s2a
af1sj2
af1s2t
2ag
aga2a1
a1g2a
agan1
a2g2b2
a2gd2
a1g2e1
a2ges1
ag1g2a
a2g1g2
a2gi1d1
a1g2i1
a2g2j2
ag2j1g2
ag1k2o1
a2g1k2
a2g1l2
ag1l2i1
a2g2n2
a1g2o
ago2h1
a1go2v1
a2g2p2
a2g1r2
ag2r2a1
ag1r2e1
a2g1r2o1
a2g2s2
a2g1s2t1
a1g2u1
a2g1w
a2g2å
2ah1
a1h2a2
aha1n1
ahas2
aha2t1
a2h2b
a2h2e
ah2e1r1
a1h2i
a2h2j2
a1h1j2e1
ah1k2a1
a2h1k
ah1k2i1
ah1l2e1
a2h2l2
a2h1m1
a2h1n1
a1h2o1
ah1p2o1
a2h1p
ah1v2e1
a2h1v2
a2h2ö
a2h2å
a1i
1a2i2a
a2ic1
ai1d1
a2i1d2a1
1a2i2d1s2
a2i2e1
a2i2i
a2i1j2
a2ik1
1ai1l
ai1l2e1
ai1n2a1
ai1n
ai1n2e1
1ai2n2j2
1a2in2u1
1a2ir
a2i1s
ai2s2a
a1i1t2u1
ai2x1
a2i2'
a2i2`
a2i2´
a1ï
a1í
aj1
a1j2a
a1j2e
a2j2h1
aj2ht1
a1j2i1
a2j2l2
aj1l2e1
1aj1m2o1
a2j1m2
a2j2p2
a2j2r
aj2s2e1
a2j1s2
aj1t2a1
a2j1t2
a1j2ö
2ak
a1k2a1
a1k2e1
1ak2er
a2k2f2
a2k2g
a2k1h1
a1k2i
ak1i1n1
akis1
a2k2j2
ak2j1g2
ak1k2e1
a2k1k2
ak2k2l2
a2k1m
a1k2o1
1a2kp
ak1p2i
a2k2r2
a2k2rh
a2k2rj1
a2k2r1s
1a2k2s
ak1s2t2
1akt.
a2k1t
ak1t2a1
akt2e1
1ak2th1
1ak2t2r2
akur1
a1k2u
a2k2v2
ak2v2i1
a2k2å1
a1l2a
alas2
a1la1t1
2a1l2á1
al1b2o1
a2lb2
a2l1d2
a1l2e1
1a2l1f2
1a2l1g
1alg.
1al2g1h
al2h1t1
a2lh1
a1l2i1
1a1li2e1
a2lih1
al2i1k1
a1li1s1
a1l2ï
a2l2j2
1alj.
al2j1g2
a2l2j2s2
al1k2a1
a2l1k2
a2l1l2
al1l2a1
1a2l1m
al1m2a1
a1l2o2
alog1
a2l1p
a2l1s2
a2l1s2e1
a2l2s2t2
1al2t2r2
a2l1t2
a2l2u1
a2l2y1
a2l2æ
alæg1
1alæ2s1
a2l2ä1
a2l2ö2
a2l2å1
1a2l2´
ama2a1
a1m2a
am1b2a1
a2m1b
am2b2r2
a2m2c2
ame1n1
a1m2e
1am2e1r
a2m1g2
1am2h1k
a2m2h
am2h1t1
ami1j1
a1m2i
a2m1j2
a2m2k1
am1l2a
a2m2l
am1l2i
aml2j2
am1m2a1
a2m1m2
am2m2i1
am2n2a1
a2m1n2
a1m2o2
1amo2h
am2os1
amo2v1
a2m1p1
a2m1s2
1a2m1t
a1m2æ1
an2as2
a1n2a
ana1t1
a2n2á
a2n1b2
1a2n1c2
an1c2o1
an2d2l1
a2n1d
1an2d1r2
a1n2e
a2n2e2f
an1e2s1
a2n2g1
a1n1g2a1
1a1n1g2e
an2g1h1
an2g2l2
a1n1g2o1
an2g2s2
1an2g2t2
a2n2h2
an1h2a1
an2ht1
1an1h2y
a2ni2e
a1n2i
ani1j1
a1n2j2
a2n2j2e
a2n2j1g2
a2n1j2o
a2n1k
an1m2u1
a2n1m2
a2n1n
an1n2i1
a1n2n2o1
a1n2o
an2o1f1
1ano1g1
a1n2o1s
a1nó1
an2p2h
a2n1p2
a2n2r2
a2n1s2
a2n1s2e2
a1n2sj1
1an2s2n2
a2n1t
1an2t2r2
1a1n2u
a2n1v2
an1v2i1
a2n2ä1
a2n2ö
1a2n2'
1a2ŋ
a1o
a2o2a
1a2o1f
ao2h1
ao2i
aor1
1a2os
a2o1t
ao1t2e1
aó1
a1ô
2a1p
apa2a1
a1p2a
apas2
a1p2á1
a2p1b
ap1b2a1
ap1es1
a1p2e
a2p2h1
a2p2i1
1a2p2j2
ap1k2e1
a2p2k2
a2p2l2
1a2p1n2
a1p2o1
1ap2os1
a2p2p2
ap2p2e
1ap2p2r2
a2p2r2
ap1r2e1
1ap1r2æ1
a2p1s2
1ap1s2i
a2p1t2
apu1l1
a1p2u
ap2u2t1
a1p2ä1
a1p2ö
1a2p2`
1ap´m
a2p2´
2a2q2
aq2i1
aqu2e1
a1q2u
aq1v2æ1
a1q2v
a1r2a
ar2a1d1
1ara1j1
ar1as2
1ara2t2
a2r2á
1ar2b2b2
a2r1b2
1ar2c1t2
a2r1c
1ar2d1d2
a2r1d
a1r2e2
ar2e1d
a2r2e1l
ar2e1m1
a2r2e1p1
1ar1e2z
a2r1f2
a2r1g
1ar2g2o1
1ari.
a1r2i
1ari1d1
ari1h1
ar2i1j1
1ari1n1
aris1
a2r1i1z1
arï2e1
a2r2ï
ar2j2g2
a2rj
a2r1k
ar1k2e1
1ar1k2i1
1a1r2k1t
a2r1m2
ar2m1k1
1a1r2ms2
a2r1n
a1r2n2a1
a2r2n2e1
1a2r1n2i
ar2n2o1
a2r2o
1a2ro1i
1a1r2os
ar2p2h1
a2r1p2
a1r2p2i
a2r2q
ar1r2e1
a2r1r2
a2r1s2
ar1s2e1
ar1s2å1
ar1t2a1
a2r1t
ar2t2o1
ar2t2s1
a2r2u1
a2r1uk1
a2r2y
ar1å
1a2r2´
as2
1as.
a1s2a
a1s2á1
a2s2b2
2a1s2e
a2s2e1v
2a2s1f2
as2f2e1
a2s2g2
as2g2j2
1as2h1f
a2s1h2
a1s2i1
1asi.
a2s2ï
1a2s1í
a1sj2
1a2sj.
1a2s2j2d2
1a2s2j2g2
a2s2j2k1
a2s2k2
as1k2a1
a2s1l2
as2l2e1
a1s2l1n
a2s2m2
1a2sm.
a1s2m2a1
as1m2æ1
2a2s2n2
1as1n2e1
a1s2o1
a2s2p2
as2p2i1
a2s2r2
a1s2s2a1
a2s2s2
as1s2i1
as2sj1
1as2so1
1ass2t
1as1s2u1
2a2s2t
as1t2i1
a2s2u
a2s2v2
1as1v2i1
as1v2o1
a1s2æ1
as2å2å1
a1s2å
1a2s2'
1a2s2`
1as´n
a2s2´
1aš1g2
1a2šk2
aš1m2
a2š2o
a1t
1at.
a1t2a1
at2a1d1
atal1
a2t2á1
a2t2c2
1a2t1č
1a1t2e2e1
at2e
a1te1n1
a1t1e1s1
1a2t1h1
at1i1d
a1t2i
at1i1n
1at2i2r
a2t2ï2
a1tj2e1
at2j
a2t2j2g2
1a2t2l2
a2t1m
a2t2n1
1at2n1b2
1ato1m
a1t2o
a1to2v1
at1r2e1
a2t2r2
at2r2i1
a2t2s1
a2t2t1
at1t2a1
at1t2o1
1at2t2r2
at2t2ø1
a2t2u1
atur1
a2t1v2
a2tw2
a2t2å1
1a2t2`
a1þ
a1u1
a2ua2
1a2u1b
1a2u2e
aue1s1
1a2uf1
1a2ug1
a2u2i
a2uk1
au1l1
a2um
au1p1
au1r2e1
1a2us
a1u2s2b1
a2u1s2e1
au2s2t1
1a2u2t1
a1v
a2va1n1
a1v2a
a2v2a2s2
1a2vd1
a1v2er1
a1v2e
a1v2e1t1
a2v2h1
av2h1t1
av1i1d
a1v2i
avi2e1
a1vi1j1
avï2e1
a2v2ï2
a2v2j2
av2j2s2
av1m2a1
a2v2m2
1a2v2n
av2n1n1
av2o2e1
a1v2o
a2v1s2
1av1s2e
1a2v1t
1avt2e
1a2v1ž
a1v2å1
1a2v2'
a1w
a2w2a1
a2w2d2
a1w2e1
1a2w2g2
a2w2i
aw2j1g2
a2w1j2
a1wor1
a2w2o2
1a2x
a2x2a1
a1x2e1
1a1xm
2a1y2
a2yar1
a1ya
ay1r1
a1ys2
a1z
aza1r
a1z2a
a2z2á
a1z2e
a2z2l1
1a2z1t2
a2z2ü
a1ž
a1æ
a1ä
a1ö
a2å
a2å2b1
1aål
aå1m2e1
a2åm
1a2ån
1aå1n2e
1aå2s2
a2'
a2`
a2´
a1°
á1a2
á2ag1
á2ak1
áa2n1t1
á2a1p1
á1á
á1á2h1k1
áá2h
á1b1
áb2á2r1
á1b2á
áb1b2e1
á2b2b2
á2b2d
áb2f2
á2b2l2
1á2b1m2
á1b2o1
áb2r2
áb2u2d1
á1b2u
á2c2
áci1a1
á1c2i
á2c2l
á1č
á1ç
1á1d2á
ád1d2e1
á2d1d2
á2d1j
ád1j2a1
ád1j2o1
1á1d2o1
á2d2r2
ád2us1
á1d2u
á1d2ö
á1đ
á1e2
áe1b1
